Utah statutes.
63M-1-2705.   Duties and responsibilities.

(1)  A business resource center shall:

(a)  have a director;

(b)  be the organization responsible for identifying, tracking, coordinating, and measuring output of assisted business clients in its region;

(c)  develop programs to aid business clients in finding the resources they need;

(d)  recruit state funded agencies to locate and establish their programs in the business center's region;

(e)  initiate and encourage business education programs, including programs in collaboration with public, private, and governmental and educational institutions; and

(f)  work with the host institution in providing academic resources, including faculty and student assistance.

(2)  A business resource center shall collaborate with the host institution and state agencies to:

(a)  provide research, development, or training programs for new or existing businesses, industries, or high technology business located in its region;

(b)  assist in providing needs assessment relating to new or existing businesses, industries, or high technology business in conjunction with other public or private economic development programs or initiatives;

(c)  assist in providing business incubator space or services, or both, if considered feasible and practical, to clients based on criteria established by the office in consultation with the board;

(d)  work with local business leaders and government officials to help them formulate and implement sound, coordinated, and measurable economic development programs for their communities; and

(e)  work with local government and other entities in its region in developing and certifying non-state funded satellite business resource centers.



Enacted by Chapter 50, 2008 General Session

